en: Plain Brittany-style galette biscuits
fr: Galettes bretonnes au beurre nature

en: Brittany-style palet biscuits
fr: Palets, Palet, Palets sablés, Palet sablé, Palet breton, Palets bretons

en: Plain Brittany-style palet biscuits
fr: Palets nature

en: Shortbread biscuit with butter and chocolate
fr: Sablés beurrés au chocolat

en: Shortbread cookie with chocolate
fr: Sablés au chocolat

en: Shortbread cookie with cocoa
fr: Sablés au cacao

en: Shortbread cookie with praline
fr: sablé à la praline

en: Shortbread biscuit with chocolate
fr: Galettes au chocolat

en: Shortbread cookie with coconut
fr: Sablés à la noix de coco

en: Shortbread cookie with red berries
fr: Sablés aux fruits rouges

en: Shortbread cookie with apple
fr: Sablés aux pommes

en: Fruit shortbread cake
fr: Gâteau sablé aux fruits

en: Shortbread biscuit with fruits
fr: Biscuit sec aux fruits, Sablé aux fruits, Galette aux fruits, Palet aux fruits

en: Plain butter shortbreads
fr: Sablés nature au beurre

en: Petit-Beurre, Butter biscuit
de: Butterkekse, Butterkeks
el: πτι-μπερ
fr: petits beurres, Petit beurre, Biscuit sec petit beurre
he: פתי בר
hr: Petit beurre
id: Petit-Beurre
it: Petit-Beurre francesi
ja: バタービスケット
lb: Petit-Beurre
lt: Sviestiniai sausainiai
nl: Petit Beurre
sr: Пти-бер
tr: Petibör
zh: 不的波

en: Butter biscuit with chocolate
fr: Petit beurre au chocolat

es: Galletas maría, galletas de tipo maria
nl: Mariakaakjes, Mariakaakje

en: Neules
ca: Neules, Neula
es: Barquillos, neulas, galletas de barquillo
hr: Neules

en: Rousquilles
xx: Rousquilles
es: Galletas rosquillas
fr: Rousquilles
hr: Rousquilles

en: Gingerbreads, gingerbread
ca: Pa de gingebre
de: Lebkuchen
fi: piparit
fr: Pains d'épices, pains d'épice, pain d'épices, pain d'épice
hr: Medenjaci
it: Pan di zenzero
ja: ジンジャーブレッド
lt: Imbieriniai sausainiai
nl: Gemberkoeken
pt: Bolos de gengibre
ru: Имбирное печенье и пряники
sv: Pepparkakor, Pepparkaka